Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8506.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21.4-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21.4 entitled "Relating
to Central Falls Pension Plan" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21.4-2. Alternative acceptance by the city of Central Falls of optional retirement
for police and firefighters.
(a) The provisions of this section shall apply only to locally administered plans within the
city of Central Falls hereinafter referred collectively as the “Central Falls plan.”
(b) On or after July 16, 2019, Central Falls may accept the provisions of this chapter, by
resolution or an ordinance of its governing body, stating the group or groups of employees to be
included as provided in § 45-21-4; provided that, any and all labor organizations representing active
employees of the municipality to be included have assented to such participation of their respective
memberships through a collective bargaining agreement and ratification of the decision by a
majority vote of those members of any such labor organization present and voting. A copy of the
resolution or ordinance and proof of assent from the applicable labor organization shall be
immediately forwarded to the retirement board for review. A vote of the retirement board to accept
the entry of the group or groups of employees into the system shall be required.
(c) Effective August 31, 2019, the Central Falls plan shall be closed to new members.
(d)(1) Prior to July 1, 2026, Members members of the Central Falls plan in active service
as of August 31, 2019, shall continue to be subject to the applicable retirement ages and restrictions,

and accrue benefits on total service at the rates of the Central Falls plan pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreements in effect on August 31, 2019, between Central Falls and the labor
organizations representing members of the Central Falls plan.
(2) On and after July 1, 2026, members of the Central Falls plan in active service as of
August 31, 2019, shall be subject to the pension plan provisions set forth in the respective collective
bargaining agreements in effect on July 1, 2026, between Central Falls and the labor organizations
representing members of the Central Falls plan.
(e) Disability determinations shall be made by the retirement board, subject to the
procedures and standards of §§ 45-21.2-7 and 45-21.2-9 as applicable, for members hired prior to
September 1, 2019. If a disability retirement pension is granted, the member shall receive benefits
provided by the Central Falls pension plan pursuant to the collective bargaining agreements in
effect on August 31, 2019.
(f) Beginning September 1, 2019 July 1, 2026, firefighters and police officers in active
service that are members of the Central Falls plan in active service shall contribute an amount equal
to eleven and seven-tenths percent (11.7%) ten percent (10%) of the salary or compensation earned
or accruing to the member.
(g) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section being met, new employees
hired on or after September 1, 2019, shall be subject to all of the provisions of § 45-21.2, including
all applicable disability provisions and benefits provided by §§ 36-10.3-4 and 45-21-52.
(h) Notwithstanding anything in § 45-21-42.2 to the contrary, the cost to evaluate Central
Falls prospective membership in the retirement system pursuant to this section or § 45-21.4-3, shall
be borne by the retirement board.
(i) Notwithstanding anything in § 45-21-43.1 to the contrary, determination of the
employer contribution rate of the closed Central Falls pension plan pursuant to this section shall be
computed using an amortization period for the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as determined
by the board, based upon the recommendation of the plan’s actuary. Future actuarial gains and
losses accruing within a plan year will be amortized over individual new twenty-year (20) closed
periods consistent with § 45-21-43.1(c).
(j) Notwithstanding anything in § 45-21-56 to the contrary, if a Central Falls pension plan
pursuant to this section is in critical status as defined in § 45-65-4, and an employee of the Central
Falls pension plan leaves employment and is hired by another participating municipality that is not
in critical status as defined in § 45-65-4, then the retirement system shall transfer the amount of the
member’s total accrued liability with the Central Falls pension plan, multiplied by the funded status
of the Central Falls pension plan, to the account of the current employing municipality.
LC006396 - Page 2 of 4

(k) Upon the conditions of subsection (b) of this section being met, the city of Central Falls
shall remain liable to the retirement system for the cost of funding a retirement system for its
employees who are members of the system as provided herein, and the retirement board maintains
the right to enforce payment of any liability as provided in chapter 21 of this title.
(l) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section being met, the Central Falls
plan and the provisions of this section shall be administered in the same manner provided in chapter
21 of this title; credits for prior service and collection of contributions are determined through
reference to that chapter; provided, that where the provisions of that chapter conflict with this
chapter, then the provisions of this chapter control. Liability of contributions is enforced in the
same manner as stated in chapter 21 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006396
========
LC006396 - Page 3 of 4